Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.90.060

Electronic data service interference.

(1) A person is guilty of electronic data service interference if the person maliciously and without authorization causes the transmission of data, data program, or other electronic command that intentionally interrupts or suspends access to or use of a data network or data service.

(2) Electronic data service interference is a class C felony.

[ 2016 c 164 s 6.]